Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.588

Enforcement of agency subpoena.

(1) If a person fails to obey an agency subpoena issued in an adjudicative proceeding, or obeys the subpoena but refuses to testify or produce documents when requested concerning a matter under examination, the agency or attorney issuing the subpoena may petition the superior court of any county where the hearing is being conducted, where the subpoenaed person resides or is found, or where subpoenaed documents are located, for enforcement of the subpoena. The petition shall be accompanied by a copy of the subpoena and proof of service, shall set forth in what specific manner the subpoena has not been complied with, and shall request an order of the court to compel compliance. Upon such petition, the court shall enter an order directing the person to appear before the court at a time and place fixed in the order to show cause why the person has not obeyed the subpoena or has refused to testify or produce documents. A copy of the court's show cause order shall be served upon the person. If it appears to the court that the subpoena was properly issued, and that the particular questions the person refused to answer or the requests for production of documents were reasonable and relevant, the court shall enter an order that the person appear before the agency at the time and place fixed in the order and testify or produce the required documents, and on failing to obey this order the person shall be dealt with as for contempt of court.

(2) Agencies with statutory authority to issue investigative subpoenas may petition for enforcement of such subpoenas in accordance with subsection (1) of this section. The agency may petition the superior court of any county where the subpoenaed person resides or is found, or where subpoenaed documents are located. If it appears to the court that the subpoena was properly issued, that the investigation is being conducted for a lawfully authorized purpose, and that the testimony or documents required to be produced are adequately specified and relevant to the investigation, the court shall enter an order that the person appear before the agency at the time and place fixed in the order and testify or produce the required documents, and failing to obey this order the person shall be dealt with as for contempt of court.

(3) Petitions for enforcement of agency subpoenas are not subject to RCW 34.05.578 through 34.05.590.

[ 1989 c 175 s 30.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.